Maine, session 132, LD1997.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §1610-Q, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 684, §1, is amended to read:
§1610-Q. Additional securities; judicial branch facilities in Androscoggin,
Cumberland, Franklin, Hancock, Penobscot, Sagadahoc and Somerset
counties
Notwithstanding any limitation on the amount of securities that may be issued pursuant
to section 1606, subsection 2, the authority may issue additional securities from time to
time in an aggregate amount not to exceed $205,000,000 outstanding at any one time for
the purposes of paying the costs associated with the planning, purchasing, financing,
acquiring, constructing, renovating, furnishing, equipping, improving, extending, enlarging
and consolidating new and existing facilities and projects relating to the judicial branch in
the counties of Androscoggin, Cumberland, Franklin, Hancock, Penobscot, Sagadahoc and
Somerset and planning for other court facilities.
Page 1 - 132LR2809(03)